Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-354
Trailer, defined.

Trailer means any device without motive power designed for carrying persons or property and being towed by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle. Trailer does not include an auxiliary axle or a car toter or tow dolly.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 54;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 52.

Trailer and truck-tractor are defined by this section. Ashton v. State, 173 Neb. 78, 112 N.W.2d 540 (1961).